src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
Noun inflection
The VOTIC language nouns inflect in cases.

* LEXICON N_KOIRW  koirõ:koir This requires no twolc
Back harmony
Stem vowel is zero before plural marker in i
Consonant structure not involved in gradation
* +Use/SpellNoSugg+Pl+Gen:ije # ;  temporary fix to indicate that this is not the generated form

* LEXICON N_POIKÕ  poikõ:poikõ
* +Sg+Nom: K ;   poikõ

* :%^WGStem%^VowRm%>a BACK_NMN_SG-GEN-STEM ;   poiga
+Sg+Gen, +Sg+Com

* :%^VowRm%>a BACK_NMN_SG-PAR-STEM ;   poika
+Sg+Ill, +Sg+Ter

* :%^WGStem BACK_NMN_SG_INE-STEM ;   poigõ-
+Sg+Ela, +Sg+All, +Sg+Ade, +Sg+Abl, +Sg+Tra, +Pl+Nom

* :%^VowRm%>i BACK_NMN_PL-OBL ;  poiki-

* LEXICON N_TÜTTÖ  tüttö:tüttö
* +Sg+Nom: K ;   tüttö
* :%^WGStem FRONT_NMN_SG-GEN-STEM ;   tütö
+Sg+Gen, +Sg+Com
* : FRONT_NMN_SG-PAR-STEM ;   tüttö
+Sg+Ill, +Sg+Ter
* :%^WGStem FRONT_NMN_SG_INE-STEM ;   tütö-
+Sg+Ela, +Sg+All, +Sg+Ade, +Sg+Abl, +Sg+Tra, +Pl+Nom
* :%>i FRONT_NMN_PL-OBL ;    tüttöi

LEXICON N_ALUS   alus:aluks

LEXICON N_AMMÕZ  ammõz:ampa
:%^WGStem%^VowRmõz BACK_NMN_SG-NOM ;  ammõz
: BACK_NMN_SG-GEN-STEM ;     	  ampa-
:%^WGStems  BACK_NMN_SG-PAR_sõ ;	  ammas-
:  BACK_NMN_SG-ILL-STEM ;	  ampa-
: BACK_NMN_SG_INE-STEM ;	  ampa-
:%>i BACK_NMN_PL-OBL ;	 	  ampai-

* +Sg+Gen: K ;   poiga
* +Sg+Com:%>ka K ;  poigaka
* +Sg+Gen: K ;	 tütö
* +Sg+Com:%>ka K ;  tütöka

* +Sg+Par: K ;   poika
* +Sg+Par:%>sõ K ;   ammassõ

* +Sg+Ill:%>sõ K ;   poikasõ
* +Use/NG+Sg+Ill: K ;   poika
* +Sg+Ter:%>ssaa K ;   poikassaa
* +Sg+Par: K ;   poika
* +Sg+Ill:%>se K ;   poikasõ
* +Use/NG+Sg+Ill: K ;   poika
* +Sg+Ter:%>ssaa K ;   poikassaa

* +Sg+Ine:%>z K ;   poigõz
* +Sg+Ela:%>ssõ K ;   poigõssõ
* +Sg+All:%>llõ K ;   poigõllõ
* +Sg+Ade:%>llõ K ;   poigõllõ
* +Sg+Abl:%>ltõ K ;   poigõltõ
* +Sg+Tra:%>ssi K ;   poigõssi
* +Pl+Nom:%>d K ;   poigõd
* +Sg+Ine:%>z K ;   tütöz
* +Sg+Ela:%>sse K ;   tütössõ
* +Sg+All:%>lle K ;   tütöllõ
* +Sg+Ade:%>lle K ;   tütöllõ
* +Sg+Abl:%>lte K ;   tütöltõ
* +Sg+Tra:%>ssi K ;   tütössi
* +Pl+Nom:%>d K ;   tütöd

* +Pl+Gen:%>jõ K ;   poikijõ
* +Use/NG+Pl+Gen: K ;   poiki
* +Pl+Par: K ;   poiki
* +Use/NG+Pl+Par:%>tõ K ;   poikitõ
* +Pl+Ill:%>sõ K ;   poikisõ
* +Use/NG+Pl+Ill: K ;   poiki
* +Pl+Ine:%>z K ;   poikiz
* +Pl+Ela:%>ssõ K ;   poikissõ
* +Pl+All:%>llõ K ;   poikillõ
* +Pl+Ade:%>llõ K ;   poikillõ
* +Pl+Abl:%>ltõ K ;   poikiltõ
* +Pl+Tra:%>ssi K ;   poikissi
* +Pl+Ter:%>ssaa K ;   poikissaa
* +Pl+Com:%>ka K ;   poikika

* +Pl+Gen:%>je K ;   tüttöije
* +Use/NG+Pl+Gen: K ;   tüttöi
* +Pl+Par: K ;   tüttöi
* +Use/NG+Pl+Par:%>te K ;   tüttöite
* +Pl+Ill:%>se K ;   tüttöise
* +Use/NG+Pl+Ill: K ;   tüttöi
* +Pl+Ine:%>z K ;   tüttöiz
* +Pl+Ela:%>sse K ;   tüttöisse
* +Pl+All:%>lle K ;   tüttöille
* +Pl+Ade:%>lle K ;   tüttöille
* +Pl+Abl:%>lte K ;   tüttöilte
* +Pl+Tra:%>ssi K ;   tüttöissi
* +Pl+Ter:%>ssaa K ;   tüttöissaa
* +Pl+Com:%>ka K ;   tüttöika

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vot/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
